apertium-kaz.kaz.leipzig.lexc
LEXICON V-COMMON

V-PERS-IRREGULAR-NEGATIVE-1 ;
%<NEG%>: V-PERS-IRREGULAR-NEGATIVE-2 ;
V-PERS-REGULAR-NEGATIVE ;
%<NEG%>: V-PERS-REGULAR-NEGATIVE-2 ;
%<GER%>: V-ETU-SURFACE ;
%<NEG%>%<GER%>:%>%{M%}%{A%} V-ETU-SURFACE ;
%<PTCP%>: V-ESIMSHE-SURFACE ;
%<PTCP%>: V-ESIMSHE-NONEG-SURFACE ;
%<NEG%>%<PTCP%>:%>%{M%}%{A%} V-ESIMSHE-SURFACE ;
%<NEG%>%<PTCP%>: V-ESIMSHE-NEG-SURFACE ;
%<CVB%>: V-KOSIMSHE-SURFACE ;
%<CVB%>: V-KOSIMSHE-NONEG-SURFACE ;
%<NEG%>%<CVB%>:%>%{M%}%{A%} V-KOSIMSHE-SURFACE ;
%<NEG%>%<CVB%>: V-KOSIMSHE-NEG-SURFACE ;

LEXICON V-DER

%<CAUS%>:%>%{I%}с V-COMMON ;
%<PASS%>:%>%{I%}%{l%} V-COMMON ;
%<REFL%>:%>%{I%}%{l%} V-COMMON ;
%<CAUS%>:%>%{I%}т V-COMMON ;
%<CAUS%>:%>%{G%}%{I%}з V-COMMON ;
%<CAUS%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}р V-COMMON ;

LEXICON V-TV-NOPASS

%<VB%>: V-COMMON ;
%<VB%>: V-DER ;

LEXICON V-TV-PASS

! e.g. көрін
%<VB%>%<PASS%>: V-COMMON ;

LEXICON V-TV

%<VB%>: V-COMMON ;
%<VB%>: V-DER ;
%<VB%>%<PASS%>:%>%{I%}%{l%} V-COMMON ;
%<VB%>%<REFL%>:%>%{I%}%{l%} V-COMMON ;

LEXICON V-IV

%<VB%>: V-COMMON ;
%<VB%>: V-DER ;


LEXICON R_ETK


%<AUX%>: V-PERS-IRREGULAR-NEGATIVE-1 ;
%<AUX%>%<NEG%>: V-PERS-IRREGULAR-NEGATIVE-2 ;
%<AUX%>: V-PERS-REGULAR-NEGATIVE ;
%<AUX%>%<NEG%>: V-PERS-REGULAR-NEGATIVE-2 ;
%<AUX%>%<GER%>: V-ETU-SURFACE ;
%<AUX%>%<NEG%>%<GER%>:%>%{M%}%{A%} V-ETU-SURFACE ;
%<AUX%>%<PTCP%>: V-ESIMSHE-SURFACE ;
%<AUX%>%<PTCP%>: V-ESIMSHE-NONEG-SURFACE ;
%<AUX%>%<NEG%>%<PTCP%>:%>%{M%}%{A%} V-ESIMSHE-SURFACE ;
%<AUX%>%<NEG%>%<PTCP%>: V-ESIMSHE-NEG-SURFACE ;
%<AUX%>%<CVB%>: V-KOSIMSHE-SURFACE ;
%<AUX%>%<CVB%>: V-KOSIMSHE-NONEG-SURFACE ;
%<AUX%>%<NEG%>%<CVB%>:%>%{M%}%{A%} V-KOSIMSHE-SURFACE ;
%<AUX%>%<NEG%>%<CVB%>: V-KOSIMSHE-NEG-SURFACE ;


LEXICON R_ETP


%<VB%>: V-PERS-S1 ;
%<VB%>: V-PERS-IRREGULAR-NEGATIVE-1 ;
%<VB%>%<NEG%>: V-PERS-IRREGULAR-NEGATIVE-2 ;
%<VB%>: V-PERS-REGULAR-NEGATIVE ;
%<VB%>%<NEG%>: V-PERS-REGULAR-NEGATIVE-2 ;
%<VB%>%<GER%>: V-ETU-SURFACE ;
%<VB%>%<NEG%>%<GER%>:%>%{M%}%{A%} V-ETU-SURFACE ;
%<VB%>%<PTCP%>: V-ESIMSHE-SURFACE ;
%<VB%>%<PTCP%>: V-ESIMSHE-NONEG-SURFACE ;
%<VB%>%<NEG%>%<PTCP%>:%>%{M%}%{A%} V-ESIMSHE-SURFACE ;
%<VB%>%<NEG%>%<PTCP%>: V-ESIMSHE-NEG-SURFACE ;
%<VB%>%<CVB%>: V-KOSIMSHE-SURFACE ;
%<VB%>%<CVB%>: V-KOSIMSHE-NONEG-SURFACE ;
%<VB%>%<NEG%>%<CVB%>:%>%{M%}%{A%} V-KOSIMSHE-SURFACE ;
%<VB%>%<NEG%>%<CVB%>: V-KOSIMSHE-NEG-SURFACE ;


LEXICON R_ETPK


%<AUX%>: V-PERS-S1 ;
%<AUX%>: V-PERS-IRREGULAR-NEGATIVE-1 ;
%<AUX%>%<NEG%>: V-PERS-IRREGULAR-NEGATIVE-2 ;
%<AUX%>: V-PERS-REGULAR-NEGATIVE ;
%<AUX%>%<NEG%>: V-PERS-REGULAR-NEGATIVE-2 ;
%<AUX%>%<GER%>: V-ETU-SURFACE ;
%<AUX%>%<NEG%>%<GER%>:%>%{M%}%{A%} V-ETU-SURFACE ;
%<AUX%>%<PTCP%>: V-ESIMSHE-SURFACE ;
%<AUX%>%<PTCP%>: V-ESIMSHE-NONEG-SURFACE ;
%<AUX%>%<NEG%>%<PTCP%>:%>%{M%}%{A%} V-ESIMSHE-SURFACE ;
%<AUX%>%<NEG%>%<PTCP%>: V-ESIMSHE-NEG-SURFACE ;
%<AUX%>%<CVB%>: V-KOSIMSHE-SURFACE ;
%<AUX%>%<CVB%>: V-KOSIMSHE-NONEG-SURFACE ;
%<AUX%>%<NEG%>%<CVB%>:%>%{M%}%{A%} V-KOSIMSHE-SURFACE ;
%<AUX%>%<NEG%>%<CVB%>: V-KOSIMSHE-NEG-SURFACE ;


LEXICON R_ETP_R_ETPK


R_ETP ;
R_ETPK ;



!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!     copula

LEXICON Copula

е%<VB%>%<PTCP%>:екен POSSESSIVES ;
е%<VB%>%<PTCP%>:екен%>%{L%}%{I%}к POSSESSIVES ;
е%<VB%>%<PTCP%>:екен V-PERS-S1 ;
е%<VB%>%<PST%>:е%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-S2 ;
е%<VB%>%<NEG%>%<PTCP%>:емес V-PERS-S1 ;
е%<VB%>%<NEG%>%<PTCP%>:емес V-PERS-S1 ;
емес%<VBNEG%>:емес V-PERS-S1 ;
жоқ%<VBNEG%>:жоқ V-PERS-S1 ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!     PRONOUN'S INFLECTION

!!!!!!!   P E R S O N A L

LEXICON PRON-P12SG-CASES

:ен CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<GEN%>:енің CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<DAT%>:аған CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<ACC%>:ені CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<ABL%>:енен CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<LOC%>:енде CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<INSCOM%>:енімен CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<INSCOM%>:еніменен CLITICS-NO-COP ; ! Dir/LR
%<GEN%>:енікі%{n%} CASES ;
%<LATT%>:ендегі CASES ;
%<SML%>:ендей CLITICS-NO-COP ;
:еніңше CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON PRON-P3SG-CASES

:л CLITICS-NO-COP ;
: CLITICS-NO-COP ; ! Dir/LR
%<GEN%>:ның CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<DAT%>:ған CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<ACC%>:ны CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<ABL%>:дан CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<LOC%>:нда CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<INSCOM%>:нымен CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<INSCOM%>:ныменен CLITICS-NO-COP ; ! Dir/LR
%<GEN%>:нікі%{n%} CASES ;
%<LOC%>:ндағы ATTR-SUBST ;
%<SML%>:ндай CLITICS-NO-COP ;
:ныңша CLITICS-NO-COP ;


LEXICON PRON-PERS-INFL

CASES-ETC ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS

мен%<PRO%>:м PRON-P12SG-CASES ;

сен%<PRO%>:с PRON-P12SG-CASES ;

ол%<PRO%>:о PRON-P3SG-CASES ;
! the following severely overgenerates.  Please don't uncomment it. -JNW 2018-06-28
!ол%<PRO%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:а PRON-P3SG-CASES ;
ол%<PRO%>%+үшін:аның% үшін POST ; ! Dir/LR

біз%<PRO%>:біз PRON-PERS-INFL ;
біз%<PRO%>%<p1%>:біз%>дер PRON-PERS-INFL ; ! Dir/LR
біз%<PRO%>%<GEN%>%<EQU%>:біздіңше CLITICS-NO-COP ;

сен%<PRO%>%<PL%>:сендер PRON-PERS-INFL ;
сен%<PRO%>%<PL%>%<EQU%>:сендерше CLITICS-NO-COP ;

о%<PRO%>%<PL%>:олар PRON-PERS-INFL ;
о%<PRO%>%<PL%>%<EQU%>:оларша CLITICS-NO-COP ;

сіз%<PRO%>:сіз PRON-PERS-INFL ;
сіз%<PRO%>%<GEN%>%<EQU%>:сіздіңше CLITICS-NO-COP ;
сіз%<PRO%>%<PL%>:сіздер PRON-PERS-INFL ;
сіз%<PRO%>%<PL%>%<EQU%>:сіздерше CLITICS-NO-COP ;

!!!!!!!   D E M O N S T R A T I V E

LEXICON PRON-DEM-INFL

%<GEN%>:ның CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<DAT%>:ған CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<ACC%>:ны CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<ABL%>:дан CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
%<ABL%>:нан CLITICS-INCL-COP ; ! Dir/LR FIXME actually only "осы" seems to take this.
%<LOC%>:нда CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
%<POSS%>:нікі%{n%} CASES ;
%<LATT%>:ндагы CASES ;
%<SML%>:ндай CASES ;  ! FIXME: should have <det>, etc.
:лай CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
:нша CLITICS-NO-COP ;         !

%<PL%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CASES-ETC ;
%<PL%>%<POSS.3SP%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р%{I%}%{n%} CASES ;

LEXICON PRON-DEM-BUL

бұл%<PRO%>:бұл CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
бұл%<PRO%>:бұ CLITICS-INCL-COP ; ! Dir/LR
бұл%<PRO%>%<GEN%>:бұның CLITICS-NO-COP ;
бұл%<PRO%>%<GEN%>:мұның CLITICS-NO-COP ; ! Dir/LR
бұл%<PRO%>%<DAT%>:бұған CLITICS-NO-COP ;
бұл%<PRO%>%<ACC%>:бұны CLITICS-NO-COP ;
бұл%<PRO%>%<ACC%>:мұны CLITICS-NO-COP ; ! Dir/LR
бұл%<PRO%>%<ABL%>:бұдан CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
бұл%<PRO%>%<ABL%>:мұнан CLITICS-INCL-COP ; ! Dir/LR
бұл%<PRO%>%<LOC%>:бұнда CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
бұл%<PRO%>%<LOC%>:мұнда CLITICS-INCL-COP ; ! Dir/LR
бұл%<PRO%>%<INSCOM%>:бұнымен CLITICS-NO-COP ;
бұл%<PRO%>%<INSCOM%>:бұныменен CLITICS-NO-COP ; ! Dir/LR
бұл%<PRO%>%<INSCOM%>:мұнымен CLITICS-NO-COP ; ! Dir/LR
бұл%<PRO%>%<INSCOM%>:мұныменен CLITICS-NO-COP ; ! Dir/LR
бұл%<PRO%>%<POSS%>:мұнікі%{n%} CASES ; ! FIXME: check "м" vs "б"
бұл%<PRO%>%<LATT%>:бұндағы CASES ;
бұл%<PRO%>%<LATT%>:мұндағы CASES ; ! Dir/LR
бұл%<PRO%>%<SML%>:мұндай CASES ;
бұл%<PRO%>%<SML%>:бұндай CASES ; ! Dir/LR
бұл%<PRO%>%<SML%>%<POSS.3SP%>:мұндай%{I%}%{n%} CASES ;
бұл%<PRO%>%<SML%>%<PL%>:мұндайлар CASES ;
бұл%<PRO%>%<SML%>%<PL%>%<POSS.3SP%>:мұндайлары%{n%} CASES ;
бұл%<PRO%>:былай CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
бұл%<PRO%>:бұлай CLITICS-INCL-COP ; ! Dir/LR
бұл%<PRO%>:мұнша CLITICS-NO-COP ;
бұл%<PRO%>%<POSS.3SP%>:бұнысы%{n%} CASES ;

бұл%<PRO%>%<PL%>:бұлар CASES-ETC ;
бұл%<PRO%>%<PL%>%<POSS.3SP%>:бұлары%{n%} CASES ;

LEXICON PRON-DEM-MINA

мына%<PRO%>:мына CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
мына%<PRO%>%<GEN%>:мынаның CLITICS-NO-COP ;
мына%<PRO%>%<DAT%>:мынаған CLITICS-NO-COP ;
мына%<PRO%>%<ACC%>:мынаны CLITICS-NO-COP ;
мына%<PRO%>%<ABL%>:мынадан CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
мына%<PRO%>%<LOC%>:мынада CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
мына%<PRO%>%<INSCOM%>:мынамен CLITICS-NO-COP ;
мына%<PRO%>%<INSCOM%>:мынаменен CLITICS-NO-COP ; ! Dir/LR
мына%<PRO%>%<POSS%>:мынанікі%{n%} CASES ;
мына%<PRO%>%<LATT%>:мынадағы CASES ;
мына%<PRO%>%<SML%>:мынадай CASES ;
мына%<PRO%>:мыналай CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
мына%<PRO%>%<POSS.3SP%>:мына%<PRO%>%{S%}%{I%}%{n%} CASES ;

мына%<PRO%>%<PL%>:мыналар CASES-ETC ;
мына%<PRO%>%<PL%>%<POSS.3SP%>:мыналары%{n%} CASES ;

LEXICON PRON-DEM-MINAU

мынау%<PRO%>:мынау CLITICS-INCL-COP ;

 LEXICON Verbs
сылдырлат:сылдырлат V-IV ; ! ""
шырмал:шырмал V-IV ; ! ""
қажа:қажа V-TV ; ! ""
бықсы:бықсы V-IV ; ! ""
айқындан:айқындан V-TV-PASS ; ! ""
айқышта:айқышта V-TV ; ! "to lay criss-cross"
айны:айны V-IV ; ! "spoil,lose flavor"
алшақта:алшақта V-IV ; ! "put on airs,feel at ease,feel unconstrained"
амалда:амалда V-TV ; ! "contrive,manage,find a way out"
ассигнациялан:ассигнациялан V-IV ; ! ""
асыра:асыра V-TV ; ! "feed,keep,support,maintain"
бағыс:бағыс V-TV-NOPASS ; ! "educate,look after" (kaz tat) coop
бақылда:бақылда V-IV ; ! "to bleat"
балағатта:балағатта V-TV ; ! ""
бесеуле:бесеуле V-TV ; ! "to do something in groups of five"
бозар:бозар V-IV ; ! "to turn gray"
бүйірле:бүйірле V-TV ; ! "to lash the sides (of a horse)"
бықсы:бықсы V-IV ; ! "to smoke"
де:де V-TV-NOPASS ; ! "speak"
де:делін V-TV-PASS ; ! "speak"
дәмде:дәмде V-TV ; !
европалас:европалас V-IV ; ! "to become europeanised" (tat) recognise европалаш
еле:еле V-TV ; ! "замечать,обращать внимание"
еркінде:еркінде V-IV ; ! "to feel free"
есті:есті V-TV ; ! "hear"
жалында:жалында V-IV ; ! "to flame"
жаңала:жаңала V-TV ; ! ""
желімде:желімде V-TV ; ! "to glue"
жеңіл:жеңіл V-IV ; ! ""
жөнелт:жөнелт V-TV ; ! "" ! Use/MT
жұмыртқала:жұмыртқала V-IV ; ! "to lay eggs"
зек:зек V-TV ; ! ""
қабылда:қабылда V-TV-NOPASS ; ! ""
қабылда:қабылдан V-TV-PASS ; ! ""
қағыс:қағыс V-TV ; ! "вколачивать" (каz tat) coop
кодта:кодта V-IV ; ! ""
қалыпта:қалыпта V-TV ; !
қаңқ:қаңқ V-IV ; ! "wander aimlessly" (tat) trimm
қармала:қармала V-TV ; ! "feel"
қашықта:қашықта V-IV ; ! ""
қина:қина V-TV ; ! ""
қолжет:қолжет V-IV ; ! "to attain"
көр:көр V-TV-NOPASS ; ! "see"
қор:қор V-TV ; ! "to guard"
көр:көрін V-TV-PASS ; ! "be seen"
күйзел:күйзел V-IV ; ! "suffer"
қуала:қуала V-TV ; ! "chase"
бүгіл:бүгіл V-TV ; !
сезіл:сезіл V-IV ; ! Der/Pass
пышылда:пышылда V-TV ; !
көңілсізден:көңілсізден V-TV ; !
ызаландыр:ызаландыр V-IV ; !
күңкілде:күңкілде V-TV ; !
құтыл:құтыл V-IV ; ! "to get rid of"
қысқарт:қысқарт V-TV ; !"Use/MT"
мәнерле:мәнерле V-TV ; ! "to decorate (with a design)"
мекенде:мекенде V-IV ; !
оңда:оңда V-TV ; ! "to repair"
отал:отал V-IV ; ! "вспыхнуть"
өсекте:өсекте V-TV ; !
өштес:өштес V-IV ; ! "be at loggerheads with"
сақта:сақта V-TV ; ! ""
сауық:сауық V-IV ; ! "get well,recover"
советтендір:советтендір V-TV ; ! "to sovietize"
сұрлан:сұрлан V-IV ; ! ""
сүрт:сүрт V-TV ; !
боямала:боямала V-TV ; ! ""
ақсит:ақсит V-IV ; ! ""
таныт:таныт V-TV ; ! "make familiar with" ! Der/Caus
тасымалда:тасымалда V-TV-NOPASS ; ! "move, transfer"
тасымалда:тасымалдан V-TV-PASS ; ! "move, transfer"
тасы:тасы V-IV ; ! "boil over"
қозғалт:қозғалт V-TV ; ! ""
дүрілде:дүрілде V-TV ; ! ""
діңкеле:діңкеле V-TV ; ! ""
дәнден:дәнден V-IV ; ! ""
еркелен:еркелен V-TV ; ! ""
аңқ:аңқ V-TV ; ! ""
өңсіздендір:өңсіздендір V-TV ; ! ""
жұмарла:жұмарла V-TV ; ! ""
дүбірле:дүбірле V-TV ; ! ""
айқастыр:айқастыр V-TV ; ! ""
татуластыр:татуластыр V-IV ; ! ""
түкірін:түкірін V-IV ; ! ""
жасырт:жасырт V-IV ; ! ""
қақ:қақ V-IV ; ! ""
теңсел:теңсел V-IV ; !
тер:тер V-TV ; ! "gather,pluck"
тілімде:тілімден V-TV-PASS ; ! ""
төсе:төсе V-TV ; ! ""
түйіртпектен:түйіртпектен V-IV ; ! "to clot"
түсіндір:түсіндір V-TV ; ! "" ! Der/Caus
уақтан:уақтан V-IV ; ! "to become small"
ұзарт:ұзарт V-TV ; ! "" ! Der/Caus
философта:философта V-IV ; !
цементте:цементте V-TV ; ! "to cement"
шоқы:шоқы V-TV ; ! "to peck"
шошы:шошы V-IV ; ! "to be scared"
экспортта:экспортта V-TV ; ! ""
жат:жатыр R_ETP ; !
жатыр:жатыр R_ETPK ; !
жүр:жүр R_ETP_R_ETPK ; !
отыр:отыр R_ETP_R_ETPK ; !
тұр:тұр R_ETP_R_ETPK ; !
ал:ал R_ETK ; !
баста:баста R_ETK ; !
бер:бер R_ETK ; !
біт:біт R_ETK ; !
бітір:бітір R_ETK ; !
бол:бол R_ETK ; !
ет:ет R_ETK ; ! ""
жазда:жазда R_ETK ; !
жат:жат R_ETK ; !
жібер:жібер R_ETK ; !
жүр:жүр R_ETK ; !
кел:кел R_ETK ; !
кет:кет R_ETK ; !
көр:көр R_ETK ; !
қал:қал R_ETK ; !
қой:қой R_ETK ; !
сал:сал R_ETK ; !
таста:таста R_ETK ; !
тұр:тұр R_ETK ; !
шық:шық R_ETK ; !
кұр:құр V-IV ; ! "build"  ! Use/MT eng-kaz
қаражаттандыр:қаражаттандыр V-TV ; ! ""
толық:толық V-IV ; ! ""
айтыл:айтыл V-IV ; ! ""
аңқ:аңқ V-IV ; ! ""
көн:көн V-IV ; ! ""
лепілде:лепілде V-IV ; ! ""
күтіл:күтіл V-IV ; ! ""
болма:болма V-IV ; ! ""
селкілде:селкілде V-IV ; ! "Use/MT"
жабырқа:жабырқа V-IV ; ! "Use/MT"
шектен:шектен V-IV ; ! "Use/MT"
топтастыр:топтастыр V-TV ; ! "Use/MT"
зарық:зарық V-IV ; ! "Use/MT"
